Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5168.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-17 of the General Laws entitled "Licensing of Healthcare
Facilities" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-17-9.1. Mandatory conversion to renewable energy.
(a) All healthcare facilities, as defined in § 23-17-2, shall, not later than January 1, 2026,
as a condition of maintaining their license issued pursuant to chapter 17 of title 23, begin to convert
from a reliance on fossil fuels for energy, to renewable fuels, energy sources and so called "green"
sources of energy that result in a reduction in energy consumption and cost.
(b) The department of business regulation, in consultation with the office of energy
resources and the department of health, shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement
subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000466
========